el: Επίπεδο υδροφοβικότητας: Υψηλή; Χαμηλή; Μεσαία; Εξαιρετικά υψηλή; Άλλο
bg-BG: Ниво на хидрофобност: Високо; Ниско; Средно; Ултрависоко; Други
en: Hydrophobicity level: High; Low; Medium; Ultra-High; Other
pt-BR: Hidrofobicidade nível: Alta; Baixa; Média; Ultra-alta; Outro
hr-HR: Razina hidrofobnosti: Visoka; Niska; Srednja; Vrlo visoka; Ostalo
ru: Уровень гидрофобности: Высокий; Низкий; Средний; Ультравысокий; Другое
fi: Vedenhylkivyyden taso: Korkea; Matala; Keskitaso; Erittäin korkea; Muu
ro-RO: Nivelul de hidrofobicitate: Ridicată; Scăzută; Medie; Foarte ridicată; Altele
es: Nivel de hidrofobicidad: Alto; Bajo; Medio; Ultraalto; Otro
th: ระดับการกันน้ำ: สูง; ต่ำ; ปานกลาง; สูงมากพิเศษ; อื่นๆ
ko: 소수성 수준: 높음; 낮음; 중간; 초고; 기타
vi: Mức độ kỵ nước: Cao; Thấp; Trung bình; Cực cao; Khác
sl-SI: Stopnja hidrofobnosti: Visoka; Nizka; Srednja; Zelo visoka; Drugo
cs: Úroveň hydrofobicity: Vysoká; Nízká; Střední; Ultra vysoká; Ostatní
tr: Hidrofobiklik seviyesi: Yüksek; Düşük; Orta; Ultra yüksek; Diğer
nb: Hydrofobisitetsnivå: Høy; Lav; Middels; Ultrahøy; Annet
fr: Niveau d'hydrophobie: Élevé; Faible; Moyen; Ultra-élevé; Autre
ja: 疎水性レベル: 高; 低; 中; 超高; その他
sv: Hydrofobicitetsnivå: Hög; Låg; Medium; Ultrahög; Övrigt
pt-PT: Nível de hidrofobicidade: Alto; Baixo; Médio; Ultra-alto; Outro
de: Grad der Hydrophobie: Hoch; Niedrig; Mittel; Ultrahoch; Sonstiges
pl: Poziom hydrofobowości: Wysoki; Niski; Średni; Bardzo wysoki; Inne
zh-CN: 疏水等级: 高; 低; 中; 极高; 其他
lt-LT: Hidrofobiškumo lygis: Aukštas; Žemas; Vidutinis; Itin aukštas; Kita
hu: Hidrofóbicitási szint: Magas; Alacsony; Közepes; Ultra magas; Egyéb
da: Vandafvisningsgrad: Høj; Lav; Medium; Ultrahøj; Andet
zh-TW: 疏水性等級: 高; 低; 中; 極高; 其他
sk-SK: Úroveň hydrofóbnosti: Vysoká; Nízka; Stredná; Ultravysoká; Iné
it: Livello di idrofobicità: Alto; Basso; Medio; Altissimo; Altro
nl: Hydrofobiciteitsniveau: Hoog; Laag; Gemiddeld; Ultrahoog; Overig